Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 17

Wind Energy Facility Siting

65-17-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Construct” or “construction”:

Means the process of bringing a wind energy facility to completion; and

Includes the following:

Planning;

Research, but does not include wind and environmental analysis;

Feasibility analysis, but does not include wind and environmental analysis;

Environmental evaluation, but does not include wind and environmental analysis;

Preliminary engineering;

Designing;

Relocation of utilities;

Permitting;

Environmental mitigation;

Contracting; and

Financing;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation;

“Local government” means any county, municipality, city, or other political subdivision of this state;

“Local legislation” means any ordinance, resolution, motion, amendment, regulation, or rule adopted by a local government;

“Local legislative body” means the governing body of a local government;

“Non-participating landowner” means a landowner not under a lease or other property agreement with the owner or operator of a wind turbine facility;

“Operate” or “operation”:

Means any activity associated with the management, operation, and maintenance of a completed wind energy facility; and

Includes the installation or improvement of the wind energy facility;

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other private business entity except for corporations transacting business in this state pursuant to chapter 25 of this title;

“Proprietary” in regard to information means commercial or financial information that is used either directly or indirectly in the business of any applicant submitting information to a local government under this chapter, and that gives the applicant an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over competitors who do not know or use the information, which information includes trade secrets;

“Redevelop” or “redevelopment” means the process of replanning, reconstructing, or redesigning a wind energy facility, including the acquisition, clearance, development, or disposal, or any combination of these activities, of a wind energy facility;

“Transmission facility” means a power cable, distribution line, or other equipment that delivers electricity from a wind turbine located in this state to the point of interconnection with a power distribution grid, long-distance power transmission grid, or other facility by and through which the electricity is distributed or transmitted to one (1) or more customers; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall apply to any distribution, transmission, or other facilities that are located beyond the point of interconnection with the power distribution grid or transmission grid;

“Wind energy facility”:

Means the equipment necessary for the operation of a facility that uses wind to generate electricity or that uses wind energy to heat or cool, or provide hot water for use in, a building or structure, including parts solely related to the functioning of that equipment, that cumulatively, with any other wind energy facility, has a rated capacity of one megawatt (1 MW) or more of energy and has a total height in excess of two hundred feet (200');

Includes turbines, towers, buildings, transmission facilities, and other associated facilities; and

Does not include equipment that, when installed in connection with a dwelling, transmits or uses wind energy to produce energy in a useful form for residential purposes; and

“Wind energy facility expansion” means any activity that:

Adds or substantially modifies a wind energy facility, including increasing the height or the number of the turbines, transmission facilities, or other equipment; or

Increases the footprint of the wind energy facility.

Acts 2017, ch. 368, § 2; 2018, ch. 825, §§ 14, 15.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning wind energy facility siting, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 368.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the definitions of “department”, “local legislation”, “local legislative body”, “non-participating landowner” and “proprietary”; and added “and has a total height in excess of two hundred feet (200')” at the end of (A) in the definition of “wind energy facility”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 368, § 6. May 11, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-102. Applicability.

This chapter shall not apply in any local government that has adopted regulations related to the siting of wind energy facilities in its jurisdiction on or before January 1, 2019.

This chapter shall not apply to any wind energy facility located in this state that was constructed prior to April 24, 2018.

Acts 2017, ch. 368, § 3; 2018, ch. 825, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning wind energy facility siting, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 368.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b); and, in present (a), substituted “January 1, 2019” for “July 1, 2017”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 368, § 6. May 11, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 2017, ch. 368, § 4; repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 1, effective April 24, 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-17-103 concerned a limitation period on expansion of wind energy facilities.

65-17-104. Permit required.

No person shall undertake the construction, operation, or redevelopment of a wind energy facility or a wind energy facility expansion in this state unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity is first obtained from the public utility commission pursuant to chapter 4, part 2 of this title, and a permit is obtained from the local legislative body of the local government in which the facility or expansion will be located pursuant to §§ 65-17-105 — 65-17-113. The person shall submit a copy of the certificate of public convenience and necessity with its application for a permit to the local legislative body.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-105. Local government regulation.

A local government may adopt, by action of its local legislative body, local legislation that regulates and establishes the conditions and criteria for the construction, operation, or redevelopment of wind energy facilities and for wind energy facility expansions within the jurisdiction of the local government. No such local legislation shall take effect unless it is adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the local legislative body; except, that if an industrial development board for the local government proposes such local legislation or considers a request for a permit or permit procedures prior to any local legislation being considered by the local legislative body, then the local legislation shall only be subject to a majority vote of the local legislative body. The local legislation adopted pursuant to this subsection (a) shall establish the minimum setback as provided in subdivision (e)(2)(A) for the wind energy facility or wind energy facility expansion; and shall require that environmental impact and wildlife impact assessments be conducted, if applicable, as provided in subdivisions (e)(2)(B) and (C), respectively, that the facility comply with maximum noise levels as provided in subdivision (e)(2)(D), that an applicant submit financial security as provided in subdivision (e)(2)(E), and that a permit holder decommission or remove a wind energy facility upon the occurrence of certain events as provided in subdivisions (e)(2)(F) and (G).

Any local legislation adopted by a municipal legislative body pursuant to subsection (a) shall apply only in the corporate limits of the municipality. A municipal legislative body shall not be authorized to adopt such local legislation unless the county legislative body of the county in which the municipality is located has previously adopted such local legislation within the county.

A local government that regulates the construction, operation, or redevelopment of wind energy facilities and wind energy facility expansions adopted by a local legislative body pursuant to subsection (a) shall furnish a certified copy of the adopted local legislation to the department.

The local legislation adopted pursuant to subsection (a) may provide for the issuance of permits for the construction, operation, or redevelopment of wind energy facilities and wind energy facility expansions within the jurisdiction of the local government. The local legislation shall specify procedures governing the application for and issuance, renewal, modification, suspension, revocation, or denial of the permits.

A local legislative body may deny the issuance or renewal of a permit, or revoke, suspend, or modify any existing permit for cause, including the violation of any conditions of the permit or of local legislation adopted pursuant to this chapter, obtaining the permit by misrepresentation, or failing to fully disclose all relevant facts. The local legislation or permit conditions shall include a six-month cure period during which time the local legislative body may establish financial penalties for noncompliance.

The local legislative body shall review the permit application for compliance with the local legislation adopted pursuant to this chapter, and shall conduct a public hearing after public notice has been given in accordance with subdivision (d)(3)(B) prior to making a determination on the permit application. The local legislative body shall conduct the public hearing within sixty (60) days after receiving a complete permit application.

Public notice of the permit application and the time and location of the public hearing shall be published for at least two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the local government in which the construction, operation, or redevelopment of the wind energy facility or wind energy facility expansion is to be located. The notice shall be published beginning at least thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled date of the hearing.

The notice shall provide that any comments on the construction, operation, or redevelopment of the wind energy facility, or wind energy facility expansion, must be submitted to the local legislative body by a specified date, not less than thirty (30) days from the date of the newspaper publication of the notice.

The local legislative body may appoint itself as the agency to process permit applications or conduct the public hearing, or may create or designate another agency to take such action.

The local legislative body may provide, by local legislation, that a reasonable fee be charged to cover the costs of:

Processing and reviewing permit applications;

Conducting public hearings; and

The performance of the local legislative body's duties under this chapter.

The local legislative body may adopt local legislation with any condition, criteria, or other provision it deems necessary for establishing regulations or granting a permit for the construction, operation, or redevelopment of a wind energy facility or wind energy facility expansion under this chapter. The local legislative body may issue a permit for a general boundary, and the wind energy facility may elect to move the planned locations of a wind turbine or other wind energy facility component after permit approval; provided, that the locations shall not be moved outside of the permitted boundary and shall comply with all other requirements pursuant to this chapter. The local legislative body may also institute wind energy facility design conditions for granting a permit in order to comply with any conditional approval from the wildlife resources agency and to mitigate potential impacts, as identified by the local legislative body or local agency.

Any local legislation adopted pursuant to this chapter shall require that:

The minimum setback for any wind turbine of a wind energy facility from any non-participating landowner's property line be equal to three and one-half (3.5) times the total height of the turbine structure as measured from the ground at its base to the maximum height of the blade tip; except, that a non-participating landowner may elect to sign a waiver to allow any wind turbine or group of turbines of a wind energy facility to be placed up to one and one-tenth (1.1) times the total height of the turbine structure as measured from the ground at its base to the maximum height of the blade tip from the landowner's property line;

An environmental impact assessment be conducted by qualified, third party experts, paid for by the applicant, of the potential adverse impacts within a maximum of four (4) miles of the perimeter of the facility or expansion; except, that no such assessment shall be conducted if an environmental review of the wind energy facility or any portion of the facility is required pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 4321, et seq.), which includes public input, a public hearing, an environmental impact statement, and a viewshed analysis. Any environmental impact assessment conducted pursuant to this subdivision (e)(2)(B) shall include, but not be limited to, a study of the following:

Economic impacts to individuals, property values, tourism, and agriculture;

Potential adverse impacts on ecosystems, including domestic animals, and habitat and migratory patterns for wildlife;

Viewshed analysis for national or state parks or forests, historic or cultural sites, public parks or recreation areas, or private conservation lands;

Hydrogeological assessment, including water bodies, flowing water sources, stormwater runoff, wetlands, groundwater, aquifers, and private wells within a minimum of two (2) miles of the perimeter of the facility or expansion;

Risk assessment and mitigation recommendations for shadow flicker and incidents, such as wind turbine fires, structural damage or failure, ice and blade throw, and hazardous material spills; and

Risk assessment for civil air navigation, military or law enforcement routes or training exercises, emergency medical flights, radar operations, and cell phone services;

A wildlife impact assessment be conducted through a comprehensive social, economic, and environmental study; except, that no such assessment shall be conducted if an environmental review of the wind energy facility or any portion of the facility is required pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 4321, et seq.), which includes public input, a public hearing, an environmental impact statement, and a viewshed analysis. Such local legislation shall also include as a condition of a permit a requirement that the wildlife resources agency review any such wildlife impact assessment and approve, grant conditional approval of, or deny the permit. Any such wildlife impact assessment shall include, but not be limited to, a study of the potential adverse impacts to wildlife refuges, preserves and management areas, areas that provide habitat for threatened or endangered species, primary nursery areas designated by the fish and wildlife commission and the wildlife resources agency, and critical fisheries habitats identified pursuant to applicable state or federal law. No permit shall become effective until the local government has received notification of approval or conditional approval within one hundred twenty (120) days of the permit from the wildlife resources agency;

Except during the event of inclement weather that prevents the operator of a wind energy facility from controlling the noise level of one (1) or more wind turbines that are part of the wind energy facility, any wind turbine or group of wind turbines of a wind energy facility does not exceed an immission limit at a non-participating landowner's dwelling of thirty-five A-weighted decibels (35 dBA) and forty-five A-weighted decibels (45 dBA) at a non-participating landowner's property line as determined by a qualified, third-party acoustics expert according to American National Standard Institute (ANSI) Standard 12.9 and other applicable ANSI standards; and

Prior to construction of a facility or expansion, a qualified, third-party acoustics expert, selected and paid for by the applicant, makes a baseline determination of preconstruction noise levels, including modeling and enforcement;

Prior to the start of construction of a wind energy facility, the applicant for a permit for the construction, operation, or expansion of the wind energy facility, or wind energy facility expansion, establish financial security in the amount of one hundred percent (100%) of the estimate of the total cost to decommission and remove the wind energy facility, as determined by an independent consultant selected and paid for by the applicant; and

To establish financial security pursuant to subdivision (e)(2)(E)(i), the applicant file with the local legislative body a surety bond, collateral bond, irrevocable letter of credit, parent guaranty, cash, cashier's check, certificate of deposit, bank joint custody receipt, or other approved negotiated instrument, or any combination of the foregoing, in the amount required by subdivision (e)(2)(E)(i). The local legislative body shall take custody and hold the bond or other form of financial security;

The facility is decommissioned or removed if:

Any wind turbine of a wind energy facility ceases to generate electricity for one hundred eighty (180) continuous days, unless the termination of electricity was mandated by state or federal law; provided, that one (1) or more extensions may be allowed for one-hundred-eighty-day periods at a time; or

Any wind turbine or group of wind turbines of a wind energy facility violates the noise level restrictions provided in subdivision (e)(2)(D), unless the turbine or group of turbines is brought into compliance within one hundred eighty (180) days of the violation; provided, that a single one-hundred-eighty-day extension may be allowed; and

Within twelve (12) months following the decommissioning of a facility or expansion, the property is restored to its original condition prior to commencement of activities on the site.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-106. Local government report on permitting activities.

On or before January 1, 2019, and on or before January 1 of each subsequent year, any local government that has adopted local legislation pursuant to this chapter shall submit a written report on its permitting activities to the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate. The report shall include, but not be limited to, data on the number of approved and denied permits, data summarizing the findings of the environmental impact assessment and wildlife impact assessments conducted during the permit process, data on the activities of any wind energy facilities currently in operation, and data on any decommissioned facilities.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 6.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-107. Permit does not preclude need to obtain other applicable local, state, and federal permits, licenses, or approvals.

The issuance of a permit under this chapter shall not preclude the need for the applicant to obtain any and all other applicable local, state, or federal permits, licenses, or approvals. Nothing in this chapter shall limit the ability of a local government to plan for and regulate the siting or permitting of a wind energy facility or wind energy facility expansion in accordance with applicable land-use regulations authorized under titles 5 and 6 or the applicable requirements of this title.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 7.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-108. Information subject to disclosure.

All permit applications and other documents received by a local legislative body pursuant to this chapter, and any documents used by the local legislative body to evaluate the permit application, shall be subject to disclosure under § 10-7-503; except, that at all times under this chapter, proprietary information contained in a permit application or in other documents received by the local government pursuant to this chapter, or in any other documents used by the local government to evaluate and approve or deny the permit applications, shall remain confidential and not subject to disclosure to the public pursuant to this section, § 10-7-503, or any other law.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 8.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

65-17-109. Local government right to injunctive relief.

The local legislative body may seek injunctive relief or institute other appropriate actions or proceedings in the chancery court of:

The local government in which any violation of § 65-17-104 or of the local legislation occurred; or

The local government in which the person responsible for the violation resides or has the person's principal place of business to ensure compliance with this chapter.

The chancery court may grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining the violation of § 65-17-104 or of the local legislation. The institution of an injunctive action and of the proceedings under this section is in addition to, and not in lieu of, all civil penalties and other remedies prescribed in titles 5 and 6 for permit violations and violations of local legislation.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 9.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-110. Dissemination of model local legislation.

The municipal technical advisory service (MTAS) and the county technical assistance service (CTAS) shall disseminate model local legislation for use by local governments in establishing conditions and other regulations consistent with this chapter for the issuance of permits for wind energy facilities and wind energy facility expansions.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 10.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-111. Chapter supplemental to other law.

This chapter supplements any other provision of this title or other law to provide additional authority to regulate the siting and permitting of wind energy facilities and wind energy facility expansions. Nothing in this chapter prescribes an exclusive procedure or grants exclusive powers relating to the siting or permitting of wind energy facilities and wind energy facility expansions.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 11.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-112. Chapter applicability.

This chapter shall apply in the geographical boundaries of local governments whose local legislative bodies adopt local legislation pursuant to § 65-17-105. Once adopted, local legislation may only be revoked by the same method used to adopt it.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 12.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

65-17-113. Federal preculsion.

In the event that the requirements of this chapter conflict with applicable federal law or regulations, the federal requirements shall take precedence over the conflicting requirements of this chapter.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 13.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.